Hawaii statutes.
[§672B-17] Annual report. The director
shall prepare and submit to the legislature annually, no later than twenty days
prior to the convening of each regular session, a report containing the
director's evaluation of the operation and effects of this chapter. The report
shall include a summary of the claims brought before the design claim
conciliation panel and the disposition of the claims, a description and summary
of the work of the panel under this chapter, an appraisal of the effectiveness
of this chapter in securing prompt and fair disposition of design tort claims,
a review of the number and outcomes of claims brought under section 672B-5 and
recommendations for changes, modifications or repeal of this chapter or parts
thereof with accompanying reasons and data. [L 2007, c 207, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next